Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 3 Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts

2-8-50.
Applicability of article.

This article shall apply only to the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-51.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Advertising and sales promotion” means, in addition to the ordinarily accepted meaning thereof, trade promotion and activities for the prevention, modification, or removal of trade barriers which restrict the normal flow of peanuts to market and may include the presentation of facts to and negotiations with state, federal, or foreign governmental agencies on matters which affect the marketing of peanuts included in any marketing order made effective pursuant to this article.

“Commission” means the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts created under this article.

“Distributor” means any person who engages in the operation of selling, marketing, or distributing peanuts which he has produced or has purchased or acquired from a producer or which he is marketing on behalf of a producer, whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise, but shall not include a retailer as defined in this Code section, except a retailer who purchases or acquires from, or handles on behalf of, any producer peanuts not theretofore subjected to regulation by the marketing order covering peanuts.

“Handler” means any person engaged within this state as a distributor in the business of distributing peanuts or any person engaged as a processor in the business of processing peanuts.

“Marketing order” means an order issued pursuant to this article prescribing rules and regulations governing the processing, distributing, or handling in any manner of peanuts within this state or establishing an assessment for financing the programs established under this article.

“Person” means an individual, firm, corporation, association, or any other business unit or any combination thereof and includes any state agency which engages in any of the commercial activities regulated pursuant to this article.

“Peanuts” means peanuts and peanut products produced in this state or any class, variety, or utilization thereof, either in their natural state or as processed by a producer for the purpose of marketing such product or by a processor as defined in this Code section.

“Processor” means any person engaged within this state in the operation of receiving, grading, packing, canning, extracting, preserving, grinding, crushing, or changing the form of peanuts for the purpose of preparing peanuts for market or of marketing such peanuts or engaged in any other activities performed for the purpose of preparing such peanuts for market or of marketing such peanuts but shall not include a person engaged in manufacturing another and different product from peanuts, so changed in form. The term “processor” shall not include an agent of the processor nor any person who receives peanuts for or on the account of another person.

“Producer” means any person engaged within this state in the business of producing or causing to be produced for market peanuts as defined in this Code section.

“Producer marketing” or “marketed by producers” means any or all operations performed by any producer in preparing for market and includes selling, delivering, or disposing of, for commercial purposes, peanuts which he has produced to any handler as defined in this Code section.

“Retailer” means any person who purchases or acquires peanuts for resale at retail to the general public for consumption off the premises; however, such person shall also be included within the definition of “distributor,” as set forth in this Code section, to the extent that he engages in the business of a distributor as defined in this Code section.

“Seasonal marketing regulations” means marketing regulations, applicable to a particular marketing order, made effective as prescribed in this article for the purpose of carrying into effect, by administrative order, the marketing regulatory authorizations and the provisions of such marketing order, as such authorizations or provisions may be applicable to or required by changing economic or marketing conditions and requirements from time to time during each marketing season in which such marketing order may operate. Such seasonal marketing regulations shall not extend beyond the marketing order concerned; nor shall they modify or change the language of such marketing order.

“To distribute” means to engage in the business of a distributor as defined in this Code section.

“To handle” means to engage in the business of a handler as defined in this Code section.

“To process” means to engage in the business of a processor as defined in this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 2.

2-8-52.
Commission continued in existence; powers and duties; continuation of certain rules, regulations, and orders; periodic determination as to continuation of commission.

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts which was initially established August 1, 1961, pursuant to the “Georgia Agricultural Commodities Promotion Act,” (Ga. L. 1961, p. 301), as amended, is continued in existence and is ratified and confirmed as a public corporation and instrumentality of the State of Georgia from and since such date. The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts shall be organized and constituted, have corporate existence, and possess powers and duties as stated in this article and shall be governed and controlled by this article.

Marketing Order No. 3 for Peanuts which was adopted by the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts and which was continued in existence until June 30, 1991, shall continue in effect under the provisions of this article until such date.

All rules, regulations, and orders of the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts in force and effect on July 1, 1989, shall remain in effect until otherwise amended or repealed pursuant to this article.

Prior to April 30, 1991, and each three years thereafter, balloting shall be conducted in accordance with Code Section 2-8-63 to determine whether the commission shall continue to exist and operate under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-53.
Membership of commission; division of peanut-producing counties into districts; election of members; compensation and expenses; certification of members to Secretary of State.

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts shall be composed of five members, who shall be peanut producers to be elected in the manner provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

For the purpose of electing the five members of the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts, the commission shall divide those counties within this state in which peanuts are produced into five districts, each of which shall have approximately equal quota pound production of peanuts. Any county in which peanuts are not produced shall not be included in any of the five districts. Such districts in existence on July 1, 1989, shall remain as constituted on such date until otherwise changed by the commission.

The five producer members of the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts who are serving as such on July 1, 1989, shall continue as members for the remainder of their unexpired terms. Prior to the expiration of a term of office, it shall be the duty of the commission to conduct an election for a successor. Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, elections shall be called and conducted in the manner specified by the commission. One member shall be elected from each district by the producers of peanuts residing in such district. To be eligible for election, a person must be a peanut producer. No producer of peanuts residing within the district shall be denied the right to seek election to membership on the commission.

A person must receive a majority of the votes cast for a position in order to be elected to such position; provided, however, if only one person qualifies for such position, no election shall be required and that person shall automatically become a member of the commission. If no person receives a majority of the votes cast for such position, a run-off election shall be conducted by the commission. Any member may succeed himself as a member of a commission. Members shall have terms of office of three years each and until their respective successors are elected and qualified.

Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled by election in the same manner as the original election of such members. Any person elected to fill a vacancy shall be elected for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The members of the commission shall receive compensation and reimbursement of expenses as shall be provided by the commission, and such funds shall be payable from the funds of the commission. The commission shall keep comprehensive and detailed records of all compensation and expense reimbursement paid to each member of the commission. In connection with the audits provided for in subsection (h) of Code Section 2-8-67, the state auditor shall annually prepare a comprehensive and detailed report of the compensation and reimbursement paid to each member of the commission and shall provide a copy of such report to the commission; and such report shall be available to any producer of peanuts upon written request of any such producer.

It shall be the duty of the commission to certify to the Secretary of State the membership of the commission and each change in membership as the same occurs.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 997, § 1.

2-8-54.
Authority; legal representation; acceptance and use of donations, gifts, and other property; exercise of powers of corporations; continuation of existence of commission; authority to lease or purchase property.

The commission is authorized to appoint advisory boards, special committees, and individuals, including technical and clerical personnel, to advise, aid, and assist the commission in the performance of its duties. Compensation for such services shall be fixed by the commission and may be paid from the funds of the commission. The Attorney General shall represent the commission in legal matters and shall be the attorney for the commission. If the Attorney General determines that outside legal counsel is necessary or desirable in connection with any legal matter of the commission, he shall so inform the commission and, upon approval of the commission, he shall employ such outside counsel. Compensation for such outside counsel shall be agreed upon between such counsel and the Attorney General, subject to the approval of the commission. Such compensation shall be paid from the funds of the commission. Neither Code Section 16-10-9 nor any other law shall prohibit or be applicable to the employment of such counsel.

The commission is authorized to accept donations, gifts, and other property and to use the same for commission purposes. The commission may exercise the powers and authority conferred by law upon corporations.

The commission shall continue as a public corporation and instrumentality of the State of Georgia until abolished by law or until terminated by referendum.

The commission is authorized to acquire, lease as lessee, purchase, hold, own, and use any franchise or real or personal property, whether tangible or intangible, or any interest therein and, whenever the same is no longer required for purposes of the commission, to sell, lease as lessor, transfer, or dispose thereof or to exchange the same for other property or rights which are useful for its purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 765, § 1.

2-8-55.
Commission as public corporation; name used in contracts and legal proceedings; chairman; quorum; oath of office; certification of election.

The commission shall be a public corporation and an instrumentality of the State of Georgia. By that name, style, and title, the commission may contract and be contracted with, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts. The commission shall name its chairman and determine a quorum for the transaction of business. The commission shall assume the duties and exercise the authority provided in this article without further formality than that provided in this article. Each member of the commission shall be a public officer and shall take an oath of office faithfully to perform his duties. Such oath shall be administered by the Governor or some other person qualified to administer oaths. The fact of a member’s election shall be certified to the Secretary of State, who shall issue the appropriate commission under the seal of his office.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-55

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-56.
Receipt, collection, and disbursal of funds.

The commission is authorized and it shall be its duty to receive, collect, and disburse the funds of the commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-56

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-57.
Funds held in trust; deposit, accounting, and disbursal of funds; exemption from requirements applicable to state funds.

Funds received by the commission under this article shall be held in trust for the commission. Such funds shall be deposited, accounted for, and disbursed in the same manner as the funds of this state but shall not be required to be deposited in the state treasury and appropriated therefrom as are other state funds. It is the express intent and purpose of this article to authorize the receipt, collection, and disbursement by the commission of such funds as trust funds of the commission without complying with the requirement applicable to funds collected for the use and benefit of the state.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-57

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-58.
Bond of persons handling funds under article; signing of checks, drafts, and negotiable instruments; election, powers, and duties of treasurer.

Any persons who handle funds under this article shall be bonded with good and sufficient surety in an amount determined by the commission for the accounting of any and all funds coming into their hands. All checks, drafts, and negotiable instruments which are drawn on or payable from the funds of the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts shall be signed by either the chairman or treasurer of the commission. It shall be the duty of the commission to elect annually a treasurer from among the membership of the commission. The treasurer shall have such powers and perform such duties as shall be provided by the commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-58

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-59.
Liability of commission members.

The members and employees of the commission shall not be held responsible individually in any way whatsoever to any producer, processor, distributor, or other handler or to any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No such person or employee shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of the commission. The liability of the members of the commission shall be several and not joint and no member shall be liable for the default of any other member.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-59

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-60.
Authority to confer with and make information available to governmental authorities of this state, other states, and the United States.

The commission is authorized to confer with and to make any information obtained pursuant to this article available to the duly constituted governmental authorities of this state, of other states, of political subdivisions of this state or other states, and of the United States who, by reason of their duties, have legitimate concern with the subject and to cooperate with all such authorities for the purpose of obtaining administrative uniformity and achieving the objectives of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-61.
Issuance, administration, and enforcement of marketing orders; notice and hearing as to proposed order; information from persons who may be affected by order.

The commission is authorized to issue, administer, and enforce the provisions of marketing orders regulating producer marketing or the handling of peanuts within this state.

Whenever the commission has reason to believe that the issuance of a marketing order or amendments to an existing marketing order will tend to effectuate the declared policy of this article with respect to peanuts, it shall, either upon its own motion or upon the application of any producer of peanuts or any organization of such persons, give due notice of and an opportunity for a public hearing upon a proposed marketing order or amendments to an existing marketing order.

Notice of any hearing called for such purpose shall be given by the commission by publishing a notice of such hearing for a period of not less than five days in a newspaper of general circulation published in the capital of the state and in such other newspapers as the commission may prescribe. No such public hearing shall be held prior to five days after the last day of such period of publication. The commission shall also mail a copy of such notice of hearing and a copy of such proposed marketing order or proposed amendments to all producers of peanuts whose names and addresses appear upon lists of such persons on file with the commission and who may be directly affected by the provisions of such proposed marketing order or such proposed amendments. Such notice of hearing shall in all respects comply with the requirements of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The hearing shall be public and all testimony shall be received under oath. A full and complete record of the proceedings at such hearing shall be made and maintained on file in the office of the commission. The hearing shall, in all respects, be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The hearing may be conducted by the commission or by a member of the commission, as may be designated by the commission in each instance, but no decision shall be made based on hearings conducted other than by the commission itself, at which a majority of the members thereof are present, until the members of the commission have been afforded an opportunity to review the hearing record. Where the commission conducts hearings, its recommendation shall be based on the findings reached after a review of the record of the hearing.

In order to provide the commission with accurate and reliable information with respect to the persons who may be directly affected by any proposed marketing order for peanuts when such information is not then on file with the commission, the commission is authorized and directed, whenever the commission has reason to believe that the issuance of a marketing order will tend to effectuate the declared policy of this article or upon receipt of a written application for a hearing pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, to notify all handlers of peanuts, by publication of a notice as required in paragraph (2) of this subsection, to file with the commission within ten days from the last date of such publication a report, properly certified, showing:

The correct name and address of such handler;

The quantities of peanuts affected by the proposed marketing order handled by such handler in the marketing season next preceding the filing of such report;

The correct names and addresses of all producers of peanuts who may be directly affected by such proposed marketing order, from whom such handler received peanuts in the marketing season next preceding the filing of such report; and

The quantities of peanuts received by such handler from each such producer in the marketing season next preceding the filing of such report.

The notice to handlers requiring them to file a report shall be published by the commission for a period of not less than five days in a newspaper of general circulation published in the capital of the state and in such other newspaper or newspapers as the commission may prescribe. The commission shall also mail a copy of such notice to all handlers of peanuts whose names and addresses appear upon the lists on file with the commission who may be directly affected by such proposed marketing order.

Each handler of peanuts directly affected by a proposed marketing order shall file his verified report with the commission within the time specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection. Failure or refusal of any handler to file such report shall not invalidate any proceeding taken or marketing order issued. The commission is authorized and directed to proceed upon the basis of such information and reports as may otherwise be available.

From the reports so filed and the information so received or available to the commission, including any proper corrections, the commission shall prepare a list of the names and addresses of such producers and the volume of peanuts produced or marketed by all such producers and a list of the names and addresses of such handlers and the volume of peanuts handled by all such handlers, directly affected by such proposed marketing order or amendments thereto, in the preceding marketing season. Such lists shall constitute complete and conclusive lists for use in any finding made by the commission pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 2-8-63 and such findings shall be conclusive.

The information contained in the individual reports of handlers filed with the commission pursuant to this Code section shall not be made public in such form. The information contained in such reports may be prepared in combined form for use by the commission, its agents, or other interested persons in the formulation, administration, and enforcement of a marketing order or may be made available pursuant to court order. Such information shall not be made available to anyone for private purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-62.
Recommendation of promulgation of marketing order; permissible provisions of orders; effectiveness of orders heretofore adopted and in effect on July 1, 1989.

If, upon the basis of the record of testimony and documentary evidence received at the hearing provided for in Code Section 2-8-61 and the facts officially noticed therein from official publications or institutions of recognized standing, the commission determines that the issuance of a marketing order or an amendment will tend to effectuate the intent and purpose of this article, it may recommend the promulgation of a marketing order or amendment with respect to the matters specified in the hearing notice and supported by the record, containing any or all of the following provisions, but no others:

Provisions regulating the period or periods during which peanuts or any grade, size, or quality of peanuts may be processed, distributed, or otherwise marketed within this state by any and all persons engaged in such processing, distributing, or marketing within this state; such periods shall be established by the commission so as to conform to the better principles of sound agricultural practices with respect to production of the peanuts in order to secure, so far as is commercially practical, a sufficient supply of good quality of each grade of peanuts proportionate to normal market demand and to prevent disruptive marketing practices likely to result in oversupply or scarcity, which create unnecessarily inflated prices to consumers and handlers, depressed prices to producers, or salability of products of inferior grade and quality due to unavailability of good quality products;

Provisions establishing or providing for establishing, with respect to peanuts, either as delivered by producers to handlers or processors or as handled, processed, or otherwise prepared for market or as marketed by producers, handlers, or processors:

Grading standards of quality, condition, size, maturity, or pack, which standards may include minimum standards, provided that the standards so established shall not be established below any minimum standards prescribed by law for peanuts; and

Uniform inspection and grading of peanuts in accordance with the standards so established.

Provisions for the establishment of plans for advertising and sales promotion to maintain present markets or to create new or larger markets for peanuts grown in this state or for the prevention, modification, or removal of trade barriers which obstruct the normal flow of peanuts to market. The commission is authorized to prepare, issue, administer, and enforce plans for promoting the sale of peanuts, provided that any such plan shall be directed toward promoting and increasing the sale, use, and utilization of peanuts without reference to a particular brand or trade name; and provided, further, that no advertising or sales promotion program shall be issued by the commission which makes use of false or unwarranted claims in behalf of any such product or disparages the quality, value, sale, or use of any other agricultural commodity;

Provisions prohibiting unfair trade practices by which any producer or handler tends toward establishment of monopoly, unfairly discriminates among customers as to price or quality, or engages in fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading representations, concealment, or other similar sharp business practices which are harmful to his or its customers, injurious to competitors, likely to bring into disrepute persons generally engaged in production and handling of peanuts, or detrimental to the intent and purpose of this article;

Provisions for carrying on research studies in promoting the production, marketing, sale, use and utilization, processing, and improvement of peanuts or any combination thereof and for the expenditure of moneys for such purposes. In any research carried on under this paragraph, the dean of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia and the commission shall cooperate in selecting the research project or projects to be carried on from time to time. Insofar as practicable such projects shall be carried out by the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences but, if the dean of the college and the commission determine that the college has no facilities for a particular project or that some other research agency has better facilities therefor, the project may be carried out by other research agencies selected by the commission;

Provisions establishing or providing authority for establishing, either as peanuts are produced or are delivered by producers to handlers or as peanuts are handled or otherwise prepared for market or as peanuts are marketed by producers or handlers, an educational program designed to acquaint producers, handlers, or other interested persons with quality improvement, including sanitation practices, procedures, or methods as applied to peanuts;

Provisions for the promotion of the marketing of surplus peanuts through the establishment of surplus, stabilization, or by-product pools for peanuts or any grade, size, quality, or condition thereof, providing for the sale of the peanuts in any such pool and for the equitable distribution among the persons participating therein of the net returns derived from the sale of such peanuts. Whenever the marketing order authorizes the establishment of any such pool or pools, the commission shall have the power to receive such peanuts from each producer or handler, to handle the same according to the grade, size, quality, or condition thereof, and to account to each producer or handler participating therein upon a pro rata basis for the net proceeds derived from the sale thereof. Whenever the marketing order authorizes the establishment of a surplus, stabilization, or by-product pool, the commission shall have authority to promote the marketing of surplus peanuts by making arrangements for and operating any necessary facilities for the storing, financing, grading, hauling, packing, servicing, processing, preparing for market, selling, and disposing of the contents of any pools provided for in this paragraph. Whenever the marketing order authorizes the establishment of any type of pool authorized in this paragraph, the commission shall have authority to create, by a uniform assessment upon producers, or to maintain and disburse, upon some other uniform and equitable basis, an equalization fund to be used for the removal of any inequalities between producers or handlers participating in any pool; and

Provisions for the establishment and management of a stabilization fund to compensate producers of peanuts for peanuts which must be diverted or which fail to qualify for marketing or sale in regular marketing channels due to grade, quality, or size regulations. The commission shall be authorized to provide, by regulations, for the administration of such stabilization fund, including regulations as to the type, quality or grade of peanuts, the amount of stabilization support, reporting, and qualifying procedures. Whenever the marketing order authorizes the establishment of any type of stabilization fund authorized in this paragraph, the commission shall have the authority to create such fund by a uniform assessment upon producers of peanuts and to maintain and disburse such stabilization fund in accordance with the purposes set out in this paragraph.

All provisions authorized by this Code section which are contained in marketing orders and amendments thereto heretofore adopted by the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts and in effect on July 1, 1989, shall be and remain of full force and effect until repealed or modified by the commission as provided in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 2.